Utah, session 2026, HB411.
Section 1. Section 67-5-41 is enacted to read:67-5-41. National Human Trafficking Hotline -- Three-digit access.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Department" means the Department of Health and Human Services created in Section 26B-1-201.(b)"National Human Trafficking Hotline" means the federally established, nationally available hotline that:(i)provides assistance to victims of human trafficking and individuals seeking to report suspected human trafficking; and(ii)is accessible through a 10-digit telephone number.(2)No later than December 31, 2026, the attorney general shall, in coordination with the department, petition the Federal Communications Commission, in accordance with the federal Administrative Procedure Act, 5 U.S.C. Sec. 551 et seq., and 47 C.F.R. Sec. 1.401, to initiate a rulemaking for the designation, reservation, or use of a three-digit dialing code to provide access to the National Human Trafficking Hotline.(3)If the Federal Communications Commission authorizes a three-digit dialing code for access to the National Human Trafficking Hotline:(a)the department shall coordinate with the United States Department of Health and Human Services and the nonprofit entity that operates the National Human Trafficking Hotline to support implementation of access to the hotline through the three-digit dialing code; and(b)the attorney general may:(i)coordinate with telecommunications providers operating in the state to facilitate call routing in compliance with federal requirements; and(ii)conduct public education and outreach to inform residents of the availability of the three-digit dialing code.(4)Nothing in this section authorizes the state to:(a)exercise authority over numbering resources, including the designation or reservation of a three-digit dialing code; or(b)require call routing to the National Human Trafficking Hotline, except as authorized under federal law.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.